Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-264
Summons; service.

If a
juvenile court petition is filed that alleges that the juvenile
is a juvenile as described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b),
or (4) of section 43-247, a summons with a copy of the petition
attached shall be served as provided in section 43-263 on such juvenile and
his or her parent, guardian, or custodian requiring the juvenile and such
parent, guardian, or custodian to appear personally at the time and place
stated. When so ordered by the court, personal service shall be obtained upon
such juvenile notwithstanding any other provisions of the Nebraska Juvenile
Code.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 20;

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 20;

Laws 2014, LB464, § 15.